Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-410
Licensed organization, defined.

Licensed organization shall mean a nonprofit organization or a volunteer fire company or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad licensed to conduct a lottery or raffle under the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 131;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 38.